Hawaii, session 2025, HB1018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 109-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§109-1  Stadium authority; appointment, terms.  (a)  There shall be established within the department of business, economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes only, a stadium authority whose responsibility shall be to maintain, operate, and manage the stadium development district.  The stadium authority shall consist of eleven members.  Eight members shall be appointed by the governor in the manner prescribed by section 26-34. Of the eight public members: (1)  One member shall be designated as the Aiea community representative and be a resident of one of the following areas: (A)  Excluding Ford Island, the area beginning at the intersection of the shoreline and Admiral Clarey (Ford Island) Bridge and running: (i)  Easterly along [said] that bridge to Salt Lake boulevard; (ii)  Southeasterly along [said] that boulevard to Luapele drive; (iii)  Westerly along [said] that drive to Fleet place; (iv)  Westerly along [said] that place to Ulithi street; (v)  Southwesterly along [said] that street to Luapele road; (vi)  Westerly along [said] that road to Ulihi road; (vii)  Westerly along [said] that road to Makalapa drive; (viii)  Southwesterly along [said] that drive to Halawa drive; (ix)  Northwesterly along [said] that drive to Kamehameha highway; (x)  Northerly along [said] that highway to Halawa stream; (xi)  Westerly along [said] that stream to the shoreline; and (xii)  Northerly along [said] that shoreline to its intersection with Admiral Clarey (Ford Island) Bridge; (B)  The area beginning at the intersection of Kaonohi street and H-1 freeway and running: (i)  Southeasterly along [said] that freeway to the Moanalua freeway - Kamehameha highway connector; (ii)  Northwesterly along [said] that highway connector to Kamehameha highway; (iii)  Northwesterly along [said] that highway to Aiea stream; (iv)  Southerly along [said] that stream to the shoreline; (v)  Northwesterly along [said] that shoreline to Kalauao stream; (vi)  Northeasterly along [said] that stream to Kamehameha highway; (vii)  Northwesterly along [said] that highway to Kaonohi street; and (viii)  Northeasterly along [said] that street to its intersection with H-1 freeway; or (C)  The area beginning at the intersection of Waimalu stream and Koolau ridge and running: (i)  Southeasterly along [said] that ridge to Ewa-Honolulu district boundary; (ii)  Southwesterly along [said] that boundary to Red Hill Naval Reservation boundary; (iii)  Southwesterly along [said] that boundary to Tampa drive; (iv)  Westerly along [said] that drive to the unnamed road; (v)  Northerly along [said] that road to Icarus way; (vi)  Westerly along [said] that way to the unnamed road; (vii)  Southwesterly along [said] that road to Moanalua freeway (H-201); (viii)  Westerly along [said] that freeway to H-1 freeway; (ix)  Northwesterly along [said] that freeway to Kaonohi street; (x)  Southwesterly along [said] that street to Moanalua road; (xi)  Westerly along [said] that road to Kaahumanu street; (xii)  Northerly along [said] that street to Komo Mai drive; (xiii)  Easterly along [said] that drive to Punanani gulch; (xiv)  Northeasterly along [said] that gulch to the powerline; (xv)  Southeasterly along [said] that powerline to Waimalu stream; (xvi)  Northeasterly along [said] that stream to Aiea stream; (xvii)  Easterly along [said] that stream to Waimalu stream; and (xviii)  Southeasterly along [said] that stream to its intersection with Koolau ridge; and (2)  One member shall be designated as the west Honolulu community representative and be a resident of the area beginning at the intersection of H-1 freeway and Moanalua freeway (H-201) and running: (A)  Southeasterly along [said] that freeway to Aliamanu Military Reservation southern boundary; (B)  Westerly along [said] that boundary to Wanaka street; (C)  Southwesterly along [said] that street to Likini street; (D)  Northwesterly along [said] that street to Ukana street; (E)  Southwesterly along [said] that street to Keaka drive; (F)  Northwesterly along [said] that drive to Manuwa drive; (G)  Southeasterly along [said] that drive to Pakini street; (H)  Southwesterly along [said] that street to Keaka drive; (I)  Southerly along [said] that drive to Puolo drive; (J)  Westerly along [said] that drive to Likini street; (K)  Southerly along [said] that street to Maluna street; (L)  Westerly along [said] that street to Salt Lake boulevard; (M)  Southeasterly along [said] that boulevard to the former street entrance to U.S. Naval Reservation; (N)  Southwesterly along [said] that feature to Reeves loop; (O)  Southwesterly along [said] that loop to Radford drive; (P)  Westerly along [said] that drive to H-1 freeway; and (Q)  Northerly along [said] that freeway to its intersection with Moanalua freeway (H-201). Each public member of the stadium authority shall have been a citizen of the United States and a resident of the State for at least five years [next preceding] immediately before the member's appointment.  The remaining three members shall include the director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee, who shall be an ex officio voting member, and the president of the University of Hawaii and superintendent of education, or their designees, who shall be ex officio nonvoting members of the stadium authority. (b)  The chairperson of the stadium authority shall be elected by the majority of the voting members of the stadium authority.  The term of each member shall be four years; provided that: (1)  Of the members initially appointed, three members shall serve for four years, three members shall serve for three years, and the remaining three members shall serve for two years; and (2)  The terms of the members added by Act 146, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, shall commence on July 1, 2021. No person shall be appointed consecutively to more than two terms as a member of the stadium authority.  Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of any unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments. (c) A majority of all of the voting members currently serving on the stadium authority shall constitute a quorum to do business, and the concurrence of a majority of all of the voting members currently serving on the stadium authority shall be necessary to make any action of the stadium authority valid. [(c)] (d)  The members of the stadium authority shall serve without compensation and shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST